Utah statutes.
4-22-5.   Commission may require surety bond -- Payment of premium.
The commission may require the administrator, or any of its employees, to post
a surety bond conditioned for the faithful performance of their official
duties. The amount, form, and kind of such a bond shall be fixed by the
commission and each bond premium shall be paid by the commission.
